Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.570

Cash or other security in lieu of surety bond.

In lieu of the surety bond required under the provisions of this chapter, an applicant or licensee may file with the director a deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to the director. The director may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the administration of such security.

[ 1973 c 142 s 2.]